Maine, session 132, LD630.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill, as emergency legislation, proposes to implement certain recommendations
related to beach nourishment and dune restoration projects made in the "Protecting Maine's
Beaches of the Future: 2017 Update" report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to
Resolve 2016, chapter 66.
Page 1 - 132LR0935(01)